California, session 20252026, AB840.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5273 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5273. (a) Notwithstanding the dissolution of a state redevelopment agency and subject to subdivision (b), for purposes of this chapter, an advertising display advertising the businesses and activities developed within the boundary limits of, and as a part of, an individual redevelopment agency project, as those boundaries existed on December 29, 2011, and which was in use as of December 31, 2022, may continue to exist and be considered an on-premises display, as defined in Section 5490, and subject to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 5300) and Sections 5400 to 5404, inclusive, if the advertising display meets all of the following conditions:(1) The advertising display is located within the boundary limits of the former project.(2) The advertising display was constructed on or before January 1, 2012.(3) The advertising display does not cause the reduction of federal aid highway funds provided pursuant to Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code. If an advertising display authorized under this section is subject to a notice from the United States Department of Transportation, the Federal Highway Administration, or any other applicable federal agency to the state that the operation of that display will result in the reduction of federal aid highway funds as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, the display owner or operator shall remove all advertising copy from the display within 60 days after the date the state notifies the owner or operator, and the applicable city, county, or city and county, by certified mail, of the receipt of the federal notice. Failure to remove the advertising copy pursuant to this paragraph shall result in a civil fine, imposed by the California Department of Transportation, of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day until the advertising copy is removed. The department shall not assume any liability in connection with the cessation of operation or removal of an advertising display or advertising copy pursuant to this paragraph. If the name of the owner or operator of the display is not indicated on the display, the state is only required to send the notice to the applicable city, county, or city and county.(b) An advertising display described in subdivision (a) may remain until January 1, 2026. 2028.(c) The applicable city, county, or city and county shall be responsible for ensuring that an advertising display is consistent with this section and provides a public benefit. This provision shall not be construed to preclude any enforcement authority of the department under this chapter.(d) The applicable city, county, or city and county authorizing an advertising display placed pursuant to this section shall have primary responsibility for ensuring that the display remains in conformance with all provisions of this section. If the city, county, or city and county fails to do so within 30 days of the date of mailing of a notice to the city, county, or city and county by the department, the city, county, or city and county shall hold the department harmless and indemnify the department for all costs incurred by the department to ensure compliance with this section or to defend actions challenging the authorization of displays pursuant to this section.